Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.120

Sanctions against certificate—Director's powers—Costs.

(1) Upon receipt of complaints against court reporters, the director shall investigate and evaluate the complaint to determine if disciplinary action is appropriate. The director shall hold disciplinary hearings pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

(2) After a hearing conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW and upon a finding that a certificate holder or applicant has committed unprofessional conduct or is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety due to a physical or mental condition, except as provided in RCW 9.97.020, the director may issue an order providing for one or any combination of the following:

(a) Revocation of the certification;

(b) Suspension of the certificate for a fixed or indefinite term;

(c) Restriction or limitation of the practice;

(d) Requiring the satisfactory completion of a specific program or remedial education;

(e) The monitoring of the practice by a supervisor approved by the director;

(f) Censure or reprimand;

(g) Compliance with conditions of probation for a designated period of time;

(h) Denial of the certification request;

(i) Corrective action;

(j) Refund of fees billed to or collected from the consumer.

Any of the actions under this section may be totally or partly stayed by the director. In determining what action is appropriate, the director shall consider sanctions necessary to protect the public, after which the director may consider and include in the order requirements designed to rehabilitate the certificate holder or applicant. All costs associated with compliance to orders issued under this section are the obligation of the certificate holder or applicant.

[ 2016 c 81 s 15; 1995 c 27 s 11; 1989 c 382 s 13.]

NOTES:

Finding—Conflict with federal requirements—2016 c 81: See notes following RCW 9.97.010.